Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.410

Budget—Expenditures—Revenue estimates—Requirements for a county assuming the powers of a metropolitan municipal corporation.

(1) On or before the third Monday in June of each year, each metropolitan municipal corporation shall adopt a budget for the following calendar year. Such budget shall include a separate section for each authorized metropolitan function. Expenditures shall be segregated as to operation and maintenance expenses and capital and betterment outlays. Administrative and other expense general to the corporation shall be allocated between the authorized metropolitan functions. The budget shall contain an estimate of all revenues to be collected during the following budget year, including any surplus funds remaining unexpended from the preceding year. The metropolitan council shall not be required to confine capital or betterment expenditures made from bond proceeds or emergency expenditures to items provided in the budget. The affirmative vote of three-fourths of all members of the metropolitan council shall be required to authorize emergency expenditures.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to a county that has assumed the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of a metropolitan municipal corporation under chapter 36.56 RCW. This subsection (2) shall apply only to each county that has assumed the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of a metropolitan municipal corporation under chapter 36.56 RCW.

Each county that has assumed the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of a metropolitan municipal corporation under chapter 36.56 RCW shall, on or before the third Monday in June of each year, prepare an estimate of all revenues to be collected during the following calendar year, including any surplus funds remaining unexpended from the preceding year for each authorized metropolitan function.

By June 30 of each year, the county shall adopt the rate for sewage disposal that will be charged to component cities and water-sewer districts during the following budget year.

As long as any general obligation indebtedness remains outstanding that was issued by the metropolitan municipal corporation prior to the assumption by the county, the county shall continue to impose the taxes authorized by RCW 82.14.045 and * 35.58.273(4) at the maximum rates and on all of the taxable events authorized by law. If, despite the continued imposition of those taxes, the estimate of revenues made on or before the third Monday in June shows that estimated revenues will be insufficient to make all debt service payments falling due in the following calendar year on all general obligation indebtedness issued by the metropolitan municipal corporation prior to the assumption by the county of the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of the metropolitan municipal corporation, the remaining amount required to make the debt service payments shall be designated as "supplemental income" and shall be obtained from component cities and component counties as provided under RCW 35.58.420.

The county shall prepare and adopt a budget each year in accordance with applicable general law or county charter. If supplemental income has been designated under this subsection, the supplemental income shall be reflected in the budget that is adopted. If during the budget year the actual tax revenues from the taxes imposed under the authority of RCW 82.14.045 and * 35.58.273(4) exceed the estimates upon which the supplemental income was based, the difference shall be refunded to the component cities and component counties in proportion to their payments promptly after the end of the budget year. A county that has assumed the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of a metropolitan municipal corporation under chapter 36.56 RCW shall not be required to confine capital or betterment expenditures for authorized metropolitan functions from bond proceeds or emergency expenditures to items provided in the budget.

[ 1999 c 153 s 36; 1998 c 321 s 26 (Referendum Bill No. 49, approved November 3, 1998); 1993 c 240 s 11; 1965 c 7 s 35.58.410. Prior: 1957 c 213 s 41.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 35.58.273 was repealed by 2002 c 6 s 2.

Part headings not law—1999 c 153: See note following RCW 57.04.050.

Purpose—Severability—1998 c 321: See notes following RCW 82.14.045.

Contingent effective dates—1998 c 321 ss 23-42: "*(2) Sections 23 through 30 and 32 through 42 of this act take effect January 1, 1999, and section 31 of this act takes effect June 30, 2000, if sections 1 through 21 and 44 through 46 of this act are validly submitted to and are approved and ratified by the voters at a general election held in November 1998. If sections 1 through 21 and 44 through 46 of this act are not approved and ratified, sections 23 through 42 of this act are null and void in their entirety." [ 1998 c 321 s 47 (Referendum Bill No. 49, approved November 3, 1998).]